Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201879-10,146
Swimming pool; personnel.

Every swimming pool owned, rented, leased, or otherwise used by a school district for practice, competition, or any other school function shall have at least one person present during such use who is currently certified by a nationally recognized aquatic training program in first aid, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, and drowning risk prevention.

Laws 2017, LB512, § 4.